Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201983-4,145
Incarceration work camp; failure to complete program; effect.

An offender placed at the incarceration work camp pursuant to a recommendation of the Board of Parole who fails to successfully complete the incarceration work camp program shall be returned to the board for a rescission hearing. Credit shall be given for time actually served in the incarceration work camp program.

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB83, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB340, § 5.

Defendants are to be given credit for time served at work camp programs. State v. Becker, 282 Neb. 449, 804 N.W.2d 27 (2011).